California, session 20252026, AB587.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 69510 of the Education Code is amended to read:69510. The Student Aid Commission shall be composed of the following 15 members:(a) One representative from public, proprietary, or nonprofit postsecondary schools located in California.(b) One representative from a California independent college or university.(c) One representative each from the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges.(d) Two members each of whom shall be a student enrolled in a California postsecondary educational institution at the time of appointment, and shall be enrolled in a California postsecondary educational institution for the duration of the term. A student member who graduates from an institution with no more than six months of the student member’s term remaining shall be permitted to serve for the remainder of the term.(e) (1) Three public members. This paragraph shall become inoperative on the date that a public member’s term expires.(2) Two public members and one member who has knowledge, expertise, or experience in accessing the educational benefits available to veterans of the Armed Forces of the United States. This paragraph shall become operative on the date that a public member’s term expires.(f) One representative from a California secondary school.(g) Two representatives appointed by the Senate Rules Committee.(h) Two representatives appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.